apertium-yua.yua.lexc
LEXICON DeadjectivalVerbalEndings
%<iv%>%<ipfv%>:%>t%>al PluralSubjSuffix ;
%<iv%>%<ipfv%>:%>chah%>al PluralSubjSuffix ;
%<iv%>%<pfv%>:%>chah IntransitiveSetB ;
%<iv%>%<pf%>:%>chah%>aʼan IntransitiveSetB ;
%<iv%>%<pf%>:%>chah%>ak IntransitiveSetB ;

! fixme: add transitive deadjectival endings...kuuns

LEXICON Paatal
%<iv%>%<ipfv%>:%>t%>al PluralSubjSuffix ;
%<iv%>%<pfv%>:%>tah IntransitiveSetB ;
%<iv%>%<pf%>:%>tah%>aʼan IntransitiveSetB ;
%<iv%>%<pf%>:%>t%>ak IntransitiveSetB ;

LEXICON Interjections
haah%<intj%>:haah # ;
haah%<intj%>:hàah # ;

eh%<intj%>:eh # ;
heyin%<intj%>:heyiiin # ;

aah%<intj%>:aah # ;
eeh%<intj%>:eeh # ;
máasima%<intj%>:máasima # ; ! verdad?
òolah%<intj%>:òolah # ; ! hola

ay%<intj%>:ay # ;


LEXICON Punctuation
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%¡%<sent%>:%¡ # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%¿%<lquest%>:%¿ # ;
%–%<guio%>:%– # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
…%<sent%>:…   # ;
…%<sent%>:… # ;
（%<lpar%>:（ # ;
）%<rpar%>:） # ;

LEXICON IntransReg
míis%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:míis DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
páat%<v%>%<iv%>:páat DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
páat%<v%>%<iv%>:páaht DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
páat%<v%>%<iv%>:páat Paatal ;
páat%<v%>%<iv%>:páaht Paatal ;
LEXICON Adjectives
mehen%<v%>:mehen DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ; ! shrink
kʼaʼam%<v%>:kʼaʼam DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
takʼan%<v%>:takʼan DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
úuchben%<v%>:úuchben DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
maʼalob%<v%>:maʼalob DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
óotsil%<v%>:óotsil DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
kohaʼan%<v%>:kohaʼan DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
wiʼih%<v%>:wiʼih DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
uts%<v%>:uts DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
màas%<v%>:màas DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
xàan%<v%>:xàan DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
yàan%<v%>:yàan DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
yáax%<v%>:yáax DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
yaʼax%<v%>:yaʼax DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
nohoch%<v%>:nohoch DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
koʼoh%<v%>:koʼoh DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
páah%<v%>:páah DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
káah%<v%>:káah DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
kʼabéet%<v%>:kʼabéet DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
yaʼab%<v%>:yaʼab DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
kʼaʼam%<v%>:kʼaʼam DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
kiʼichpam%<v%>:kiʼichpam DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
túumben%<v%>:túumben  DeadjectivalVerbalEndings;
nàatsʼ%<v%>:nàatsʼ DeadjectivalVerbalEndings ;
